Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1498.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Museums and education centers. new text end new text begin (a) For grants to museums and education centers: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,090,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,090,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) $125,000 each year is for The Works, Bloomington. new text end new text begin (c) $82,500 each year is for the WonderTrek Children's Museum, Brainerd-Baxter. new text end new text begin (d) $82,500 each year is for the Duluth Children's Museum, Duluth. new text end new text begin (e) $75,000 each year is for the Otter Cove Children's Museum, Fergus Falls. new text end new text begin (f) $75,000 each year is for the Children's Discovery Museum, Grand Rapids. new text end new text begin (g) $75,000 each year is for the Wheel and Cog Children's Museum, Hutchinson. new text end new text begin (h) $125,000 each year is for the Children's Museum of Southern Minnesota, Mankato. new text end new text begin (i) $125,000 each year is for the Great River Children's Museum, St. Cloud. new text end new text begin (j) $75,000 each year is for the Village Children's Museum, Willmar. new text end new text begin (k) $75,000 each year is for the Children's Discovery Museum, Breckenridge. new text end new text begin (l) $100,000 each year is for the SPARK Children's Museum, Rochester. new text end new text begin (m) $75,000 each year is for the Mini Sota Ag Museum, Benson. new text end new text begin (n) The base for fiscal year 2028 and later is $1,090,000. new text end new text begin (o) Any balance remaining in fiscal year 2026 is available in fiscal year 2027. new text end